Hawaii statutes.
§201H-202 Rental housing revolving fund. (a)
There is established the rental housing revolving fund to be administered by
the corporation.

(b) An amount from the fund, to be set by the
corporation and authorized by the legislature, may be used for administrative
expenses incurred by the corporation in administering the fund; provided that
fund moneys may not be used to finance day-to-day administrative expenses of
projects allotted fund moneys.

(c) The following may be deposited into the
fund: appropriations made by the legislature, private contributions, repayment
of loans, interest, other returns, and moneys from other sources.

(d) The fund shall be used to provide loans or
grants for the development, pre-development, construction, acquisition, preservation,
and substantial rehabilitation of rental housing units. Permitted uses of the
fund may include but are not limited to planning, design, land acquisition,
costs of options, agreements of sale, downpayments, equity financing, capacity
building of nonprofit housing developers, or other housing development services
or activities as provided in rules adopted by the corporation pursuant to
chapter 91. The rules may provide for a means of recapturing loans or grants
made from the fund if a rental housing project financed under the fund is
refinanced or sold at a later date. The rules may also provide that moneys
from the fund shall be leveraged with other financial resources to the extent
possible.

(e) Moneys available in the fund shall be used
for the purpose of providing, in whole or in part, loans or grants for rental
housing projects in the following order of priority:

(1) Projects or units in projects that are allocated
low‑income housing credits pursuant to the state housing credit ceiling under
section 42(h) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or projects or
units in projects that are funded by programs of the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development and United States Department of Agriculture
Rural Development wherein:

(A) At least fifty per cent of the available
units are for persons and families with incomes at or below eighty per cent of
the median family income of which at least five per cent of the available units
are for persons and families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of the
median family income; and

(B) The remaining units are for persons and
families with incomes at or below one hundred per cent of the median family
income;

provided that the corporation may establish rules
to ensure full occupancy of fund projects; and

(2) Mixed-income rental projects or units in a mixed‑income
rental project wherein all of the available units are for persons and families
with incomes at or below one hundred forty per cent of the median family
income.

(f) The corporation shall submit an annual
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session describing the projects funded and, with respect to rental
housing projects targeted for persons and families with incomes at or below
thirty per cent of the median family income, its efforts to develop those
rental housing projects, a description of proposals submitted for this target
group and action taken on the proposals, and any barriers to developing housing
units for this target group.

(g) For the purposes of this subpart, the
applicable median family income shall be the median family income for the
county or standard metropolitan statistical area in which the project is
located as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, as adjusted from time to time.

(h) The corporation may provide loans and
grants under this section; provided that the corporation shall establish
loan-to-value ratios to protect the fund from inordinate risk and that under no
circumstances shall the rules permit the loan‑to-value ratio to exceed
one hundred per cent; and provided further that the underwriting guidelines
include a debt-coverage ratio of not less than 1.0 to 1.

(i) For the period commencing July 1, 2005,
through June 30, 2009, the fund may be used to provide grants for rental units
set aside for persons and families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of
the median family income in any project financed in whole or in part by the
fund in proportion of those units to the total number of units in the project.
At the conclusion of the period described in this subsection, the corporation
shall report to the legislature on the number and use of grants provided and
whether the grants were an effective use of the funds for purposes of
developing rental housing for families at or below thirty per cent of the
median family income. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L 2007, c 249, §33; am L
2015, c 237, §25]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next